Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF801.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2219HV (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 801 Section 1. Section 232.2, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 7A. âCommercial sexual exploitationâ 3 means causing a child to engage in sex or sexually explicit 4 activities for money, goods, services, or the promise of money, 5 goods, or services. 6 Sec. 2. Section 232.28, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 7 to read as follows: 8 2. The Upon receiving a complaint under subsection 1, the 9 court or its designee shall refer do all of the following: 10 a. Refer the complaint to an intake officer who shall 11 consult with law enforcement authorities having knowledge of 12 the facts and conduct a preliminary inquiry to determine what 13 action should be taken. 14 b. Order the child subject to the complaint to be screened, 15 using a standardized, evidence-based, trauma-informed screening 16 tool, for commercial sexual exploitation. 17 Sec. 3. Section 232.71B, subsection 1, paragraph a, 18 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as 19 follows: 20 If the department determines a report constitutes a child 21 abuse allegation, the department shall promptly have the 22 child subject to the child abuse allegation screened, using a 23 standardized, evidence-based, trauma-informed screening tool, 24 for commercial sexual exploitation, and shall commence either a 25 child abuse assessment within twenty-four hours of receiving 26 the report or a family assessment within seventy-two hours of 27 receiving the report. 28